Wyoming, session 2025, SF0122.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 7-19-302(g) is amended to read:

7-19-302. Registration of offenders; procedure;
verification; fees.

(g) For an offender convicted of a violation of W.S.
6-2-316(a)(i) and (iv), 6-2-705, 6-4-303(b)(iv) or
6-4-304(b), if the victim was a minor, 18 U.S.C. §§ 2252B,
SF0122

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0617
2252C, 2424 and 2425, an offense in another jurisdiction
containing the same or similar elements, or arising out of
the same or similar facts or circumstances as a criminal
offense specified in this subsection or an attempt or
conspiracy to commit any of the offenses specified in this
subsection, the division shall annually verify the accuracy
of the offender's registered address, and the offender
shall annually report, in person, his current address to
the sheriff in the county in which the offender resides,
during the period in which he is required to register.
During the annual in-person verification, the sheriff shall
photograph the offender. Confirmation of the in-person
verification required under this subsection, along with the
photograph of the offender, shall be transmitted by the
sheriff to the division within three (3) working days. Any
person under this subsection who has not established a
residence or is transient, and who is reporting to the
sheriff as required under subsection (e) of this section,
shall be deemed in compliance with the address verification
requirements of this section.

SF0122

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0617
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0122